Georgia, session 2025_26, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
S. B. 68
- 1 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
15 SECTION 1.
16 Title 9 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to civil practice, is amended by
17 revising Code Section 9-10-184, relating to value of pain and suffering may be argued, as
18 follows:
19 "9-10-184.
20 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
21 (1) 'Economic damages' means pecuniary damages recoverable in tort for bodily injury
22 or wrongful death, including, but not limited to, damages for past and future medical
23 expenses; costs of rehabilitation; costs of therapy; loss of wages; loss of income; loss of
24 earning capacity; loss of services performed by the injured or deceased person as a result
25 of the injury or death, including domestic and other necessary services performed without
26 compensation; and funeral or burial expenses.
27 (2) 'Noneconomic damages' means all damages recoverable in tort for bodily injury or
28 wrongful death other than economic damages, including, but not limited to, damages for
29 physical or emotional pain, discomfort, anxiety, hardship, distress, suffering,
30 inconvenience, physical impairment, mental anguish, disfigurement, loss of enjoyment
31 of life, loss of society and companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation, and
32 in wrongful death cases, the nonpecuniary elements of the full value of life.
33 (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, in the trial of any
34 action to recover damages for bodily injury or wrongful death, counsel shall not argue the
35 worth or monetary value of noneconomic damages, and counsel shall not, in the hearing
36 of the jury or any prospective juror, elicit any testimony regarding, or make any reference
37 to, any specific amount or range of amounts of noneconomic damages, the measure of such
38 damages being the enlightened conscience of an impartial jury.
39 (c) In the trial of any action to recover damages for bodily injury or wrongful death,
40 counsel for any party shall be allowed to argue the worth or monetary value of
41 noneconomic damages only after the close of evidence and at the time of such party's first
S. B. 68
- 2 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
42 opportunity to argue, provided that such argument shall be rationally related to the
43 evidence of noneconomic damages and shall not make reference to objects or values having
44 no rational connection to the facts proved by the evidence.
45 (d) If counsel elicits any testimony, or makes any argument or reference, prohibited by this
46 Code section in the hearing of the jury or one or more prospective jurors, the court shall
47 take remedial measures as provided in Code Section 9-10-185 or shall, with respect to
48 prospective jurors, excuse the prospective jurors. In the trial of a civil action for personal
49 injuries, counsel shall be allowed to argue the worth or monetary value of pain and
50 suffering to the jury; provided, however, that any such argument shall conform to the
51 evidence or reasonable deductions from the evidence in the case."
52 SECTION 2.
53 Said title is further amended in Code Section 9-11-12, relating to answer, defenses, and
54 objections, when and how presented and heard, when defenses waived, and stay of discovery,
55 by revising subsections (a), (e), and (j) as follows:
56 "(a) When answer presented.
57 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a A defendant shall serve his
58 an answer within 30 days after the service of the summons and complaint upon him the
59 defendant, unless otherwise provided by statute. A cross-claim or counterclaim shall not
60 require an answer, unless one is required by order of the court, and shall automatically
61 stand denied.
62 (2) Unless the court sets a different time, serving a motion under this Code section alters
63 the time for serving an answer pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as follows:
64 (A) If the court denies the motion or postpones its disposition until trial, the answer
65 shall be served within 15 days after notice of the court's action; or
66 (B) If the court grants a motion for a more definite statement, the answer shall be
67 served within 15 days after the more definite statement is served."
S. B. 68
- 3 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
68 "(e) Motion for more definite statement. If a pleading to which a responsive pleading
69 is permitted is so vague or ambiguous that a party cannot reasonably be required to frame
70 a proper responsive pleading, he shall nevertheless answer or respond to the best of his
71 ability, and he such party may move for a more definite statement. The motion shall point
72 out the defects complained of and the details desired. If the motion is granted and the order
73 of the court is not obeyed within 15 days after notice of the order, or within such other time
74 as the court may fix, the court may strike the pleading to which the motion was directed or
75 make such order as it deems just."
76 "(j) Stay of discovery.
77 (1) If a party files a motion to dismiss before or at the time of filing an answer and
78 pursuant to the provisions of this Code section, discovery shall be stayed for 90 days after
79 the filing of such motion or until the ruling of the court on such motion; provided,
80 however, that, if a defendant files an answer before the ruling of the court on such
81 motion, the stay imposed by this subsection shall immediately terminate with respect to
82 such defendant, whichever is sooner. The court shall decide the motion to dismiss within
83 the 90 days provided in this paragraph of the filing of such motion.
84 (2) The discovery period and all discovery deadlines shall be extended for a period equal
85 to the duration of the stay imposed by this subsection.
86 (3) If the court has not ruled on the motion to dismiss within 90 days, the The court may
87 upon its own motion or upon motion of a party, and for good cause shown, terminate or
88 modify the stay imposed by this subsection but shall not extend such stay.
89 (4) If a motion to dismiss raises defenses set forth in paragraph (2), (3), (5), or (7) of
90 subsection (b) of this Code section; or if any party needs discovery in order to identify
91 persons who may be joined or substituted as proper parties; or if any party needs
92 discovery in order to establish the jurisdiction of the court, limited discovery needed to
93 respond to such defenses, to or identify such persons, or to establish such jurisdiction
S. B. 68
- 4 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
94 shall be permitted until the court rules on such motion notwithstanding the stay imposed
95 by this subsection.
96 (5) The provisions of this subsection shall not modify or affect the provisions of
97 paragraph (2) of subsection (f) of Code Section 9-11-23 or any other power of the court
98 to stay discovery."
99 SECTION 3.
100 Said title is further amended in Code Section 9-11-41, relating to dismissal of actions and
101 recommencement within six months, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
102 "(a) Voluntary dismissal; effect.:
103 (1) By plaintiff; by stipulation. Subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of Code
104 Section 9-11-23, Code Section 9-11-66, and any statute, an action may be dismissed by
105 the plaintiff, without order or permission of court:
106 (A) By filing a written notice of dismissal at any time before the first witness is sworn
107 the sixtieth day following the date the opposing party serves either an answer or a
108 motion for summary judgment, whichever occurs first; or
109 (B) By filing a stipulation of dismissal signed by all parties who have appeared in the
110 action.
111 (2) Effect. A dismissal under paragraph (1) of this subsection is without prejudice,
112 except that if the plaintiff previously dismissed any federal or state court action based on
113 or including the same claim, such notice or stipulation operates as an adjudication upon
114 the merits.
115 (2)(3) By order of court. Except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, an
116 action shall not be dismissed upon the plaintiff's motion except upon order of the court
117 and upon the terms and conditions as the court deems proper. If a counterclaim has been
118 pleaded by a defendant prior to the service upon him or her of the plaintiff's motion to
119 dismiss, the action shall not be dismissed against the defendant's objection unless the
S. B. 68
- 5 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
120 counterclaim can remain pending for independent adjudication by the court. Unless the
121 court order states otherwise, a dismissal under this paragraph is without prejudice.
122 (3) Effect. A dismissal under this subsection is without prejudice, except that the filing
123 of a second notice of dismissal operates as an adjudication upon the merits."
124 SECTION 4.
125 Said title is further amended in Chapter 15, relating to court and litigation costs, by adding
126 a new Code section to read as follows:
127 "9-15-16.
128 (a) In any civil action, no party shall recover the same attorney's fees, court costs, or
129 expenses of litigation more than once pursuant to one or more statutes authorizing awards
130 of attorney's fees, court costs, or expenses of litigation, whether such statute or statutes
131 authorize such awards for compensatory or punitive purposes, unless the statute or statutes
132 specifically authorize the recovery of duplicate attorney's fees, court costs, or expenses of
133 litigation.
134 (b) In any civil action, if a party seeks to recover attorney's fees pursuant to any statute
135 authorizing an award of reasonable attorney's fees, a contingent fee agreement between
136 such party and such party's attorney shall not be admissible as proof of the reasonableness
137 of the fees.
138 (c) Nothing in this Code section shall limit or diminish any contractual right to recover
139 attorney's fees, court costs, or expenses of litigation."
140 SECTION 5.
141 Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles, is amended
142 in Code Section 40-8-76.1, relating to use of safety belts in passenger vehicles, by revising
143 subsection (d) as follows:
S. B. 68
- 6 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
144 "(d)(1) The failure of an occupant of a motor vehicle to wear a seat safety belt in any seat
145 of a motor vehicle which has a seat safety belt or belts shall not be considered evidence
146 of negligence or causation, shall not otherwise be considered by the finder of fact on any
147 question of liability of any person, corporation, or insurer, shall not be any basis for
148 cancellation of coverage or increase in insurance rates, and shall not may be considered
149 in any civil action as evidence admissible on the issues of negligence, comparative
150 negligence, causation, assumption of risk, or apportionment of fault or for any other
151 purpose and may be evidence used to diminish any recovery for damages arising out of
152 the ownership, maintenance, occupancy, or operation of a motor vehicle.
153 (2) The failure of an occupant of a motor vehicle to wear a seat safety belt in any seat of
154 a motor vehicle which has a seat safety belt or belts shall not be any basis for a
155 cancellation of insurance coverage or an increase in insurance rate."
156 SECTION 6.
157 Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to torts, is amended in Chapter 3,
158 relating to liability of owners and occupiers of land, by adding a new article to read as
159 follows:
160 "ARTICLE 5
161 51-3-50.
162 As used in this article, the term:
163 (1) 'Negligent security' means any claim against an owner or occupier, or against a
164 security contractor, that:
165 (A) Sounds in tort or nuisance, including, but not limited to, any claim under Article 1
166 of this chapter;
167 (B) Seeks to recover damages for bodily injury or wrongful death; and
S. B. 68
- 7 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
168 (C) Arises from an alleged failure to keep persons on or around any premises safe from
169 the wrongful conduct of any third person.
170 (2) 'Owner or occupier' means any person that owns, leases, occupies, operates,
171 maintains, or manages real property of any kind or any director, officer, employee, or
172 agent of such person.
173 (3) 'Particularized warning of imminent wrongful conduct by a third person' means
174 information actually known to an owner or occupier and deemed credible by the owner
175 or occupier, which causes the owner or occupier to consciously understand that a third
176 person is likely to imminently engage in wrongful conduct on the premises that poses a
177 clear danger to the safety of persons upon the premises, such information being specific
178 as to the identity of the third person, the nature and character of the wrongful conduct, the
179 degree of dangerousness of the wrongful conduct, and the location, time, and
180 circumstances of the wrongful conduct.
181 (4) 'Premises' means the real property that is owned, leased, occupied, operated,
182 maintained, or managed by an owner or occupier.
183 (5) 'Prior occurrences of substantially similar wrongful conduct' means prior occurrences
184 of wrongful conduct which are sufficiently similar in nature and character, degree of
185 dangerousness, proximity, location, time, and circumstances to the wrongful conduct
186 from which a claim of negligent security arises to lead a reasonable person in the position
187 of the owner or occupier to apprehend that such wrongful conduct is reasonably likely to
188 occur upon the premises, to understand the risk of injury to persons upon the premises
189 presented by such wrongful conduct, and to understand that a specific and known
190 physical condition of the premises has created a risk of such wrongful conduct on the
191 premises that is substantially greater than the general risk of such wrongful conduct in the
192 vicinity of the premises.
S. B. 68
- 8 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
193 (6) 'Security contractor' means any person that contracts with an owner or occupier to
194 provide protective or security services upon any premises or any director, officer,
195 employee, or agent of such person.
196 (7) 'Third person' means any person other than an owner or occupier or a security
197 contractor.
198 (8) 'Wrongful conduct' means:
199 (A) Any violation of a law of this state or an ordinance of any political subdivision
200 thereof that is punishable as a felony or misdemeanor, regardless of whether such
201 violation results in an arrest, citation, accusation, indictment, or conviction; or
202 (B) Any other conduct that amounts to an intentional, or willful and wanton, tort.
203 51-3-51.
204 Except as provided in Code Section 51-3-54, an owner or occupier shall be liable for
205 negligent security arising from any injury sustained by any person upon the premises of the
206 owner or occupier as an invitee if the plaintiff proves that:
207 (1) The wrongful conduct by a third person that caused the injury sustained by the invitee
208 was reasonably foreseeable because the owner or occupier:
209 (A) Had particularized warning of imminent wrongful conduct by a third person; or
210 (B) By clear and convincing evidence, reasonably should have known that a third
211 person was reasonably likely to engage in such wrongful conduct upon the premises,
212 based on:
213 (i) Prior occurrences of substantially similar wrongful conduct upon the premises of
214 which the owner or occupier knew;
215 (ii) Prior occurrences of substantially similar wrongful conduct upon the property
216 adjoining the premises, or otherwise occurring within 500 yards of the premises, of
217 which the owner or occupier knew; or
S. B. 68
- 9 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
218 (iii) Prior occurrences of substantially similar wrongful conduct by the third person
219 whose wrongful conduct caused the injury, if the owner or occupier knew such third
220 person was or would be upon the premises and knew of such prior occurrences of
221 substantially similar wrongful conduct;
222 (2) The injury sustained by the invitee was a reasonably foreseeable consequence of such
223 wrongful conduct by a third person;
224 (3) Such wrongful conduct by a third person was a reasonably foreseeable consequence
225 of such third person exploiting a specific physical condition of the premises known to the
226 owner or occupier, which created a reasonably foreseeable risk of wrongful conduct on
227 the premises that was substantially greater than the general risk of wrongful conduct in
228 the vicinity of the premises;
229 (4) The owner or occupier failed to exercise ordinary care to remedy or mitigate such
230 specific and known physical condition of the premises and to otherwise keep the premises
231 safe from such wrongful conduct by a third person; and
232 (5) Such failure of the owner or occupier to exercise ordinary care was a proximate cause
233 of the injury sustained by the invitee.
234 51-3-52.
235 Except as provided in Code Section 51-3-54, an owner or occupier shall be liable for
236 negligent security arising from any injury sustained by any person upon the premises of the
237 owner or occupier as a licensee if the plaintiff proves that:
238 (1) The wrongful conduct by a third person that caused the injury sustained by the
239 licensee was reasonably foreseeable because the owner or occupier had particularized
240 warning of imminent wrongful conduct by a third person;
241 (2) The injury sustained by the licensee was a reasonably foreseeable consequence of
242 such wrongful conduct by a third person;
S. B. 68
- 10 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
243 (3) Such wrongful conduct by a third person was a reasonably foreseeable consequence
244 of such third person exploiting a specific physical condition of the premises known to the
245 owner or occupier, which created a reasonably foreseeable risk of wrongful conduct on
246 the premises that was substantially greater than the general risk of wrongful conduct in
247 the vicinity of the premises;
248 (4) The owner or occupier willfully and wantonly failed to exercise any care to remedy
249 or mitigate the specific and known physical condition of the premises and to otherwise
250 keep the premises safe from such wrongful conduct by a third person; and
251 (5) Such failure of the owner or occupier to exercise any care was a proximate cause of
252 the injury sustained by the licensee.
253 51-3-53.
254 (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the
255 provisions of this article shall be the sole and exclusive remedy for negligent security
256 against owners or occupiers, and no owner or occupier shall be liable for negligent security
257 except as provided in this article.
258 (b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit any cause of action brought pursuant
259 to Code Section 51-1-56 relating to a violation of Code Section 16-5-46.
260 (c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect any claim or
261 remedy for breach of contract.
262 51-3-54.
263 Notwithstanding Code Sections 51-3-51 and 51-3-52, no owner or occupier shall be liable
264 for negligent security:
265 (1) Arising from an injury sustained by a person upon the premises of the owner or
266 occupier as a trespasser;
S. B. 68
- 11 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
267 (2) Arising from an injury sustained by a person not upon the premises of the owner or
268 occupier;
269 (3) Arising from the wrongful conduct of a third person, if such wrongful conduct did
270 not occur upon the premises and in a place from which the owner or occupier had the
271 legal right and authority to exclude such third person;
272 (4) Arising from the wrongful conduct of a third person, if such third person was upon
273 the premises as a tenant or as a guest of a tenant, if the owner or occupier had
274 commenced eviction proceedings against such tenant at the time of the wrongful conduct;
275 (5) Arising from an injury sustained by a third person upon the premises of the owner
276 or occupier as an invitee or a licensee, if such person:
277 (A) Came upon the premises for the purpose of committing any violation of a law of
278 this state that is punishable as a felony or any violation of Chapter 8 of Title 16 that is
279 punishable as a misdemeanor; or
280 (B) Was engaged at the time of the injury in the commission of any violation of a law
281 of this state that is punishable as a felony or any violation of Chapter 8 of Title 16 that
282 is punishable as a misdemeanor, provided that this subparagraph shall not apply to a
283 victim of a violation of Code Section 16-5-46;
284 (6) Arising from an injury sustained upon premises that is used as a single-family
285 residence; or
286 (7) Based on a particularized warning of imminent wrongful conduct by a third person,
287 if the owner or occupier made any reasonable effort to provide such information to law
288 enforcement personnel, provided that calling 9-1-1 or otherwise making a report about
289 such information to law enforcement personnel shall be deemed a reasonable effort.
290 51-3-55.
291 (a) No owner or occupier shall be required to exercise extraordinary care to keep persons
292 on or around any premises safe from wrongful conduct by a third person, and no owner or
S. B. 68
- 12 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
293 occupier shall be required to assume the responsibilities and obligations of government for
294 law enforcement and public safety.
295 (b) In any action for negligent security, in assessing whether an owner or occupier has
296 breached a duty to exercise ordinary care to keep persons on or around any premises safe
297 from wrongful conduct by a third person, the trier of fact shall consider the security
298 measures employed by the owner or occupier at the time of the injury from which the claim
299 of negligent security arises, the need for additional or other security measures, the
300 practicality of additional or other security measures, whether additional or other security
301 measures would have prevented the injury, the respective responsibilities of owners or
302 occupiers with respect to the premises and government with respect to law enforcement and
303 public safety, and any other relevant circumstances.
304 51-3-56.
305 In any action for negligent security:
306 (1) If the trier of fact finds that any defendant is liable to the plaintiff, the trier of fact
307 shall make an apportionment of fault under Code Section 51-12-33, and in making such
308 an apportionment, the trier of fact shall reasonably apportion fault to:
309 (A) The owner or occupier;
310 (B) Any third person whose wrongful conduct was a cause of the injury from which
311 the claim of negligent security arises; and
312 (C) Any other persons to whom fault otherwise should be apportioned under Code
313 Section 51-12-33;
314 (2) In connection with an apportionment of fault under Code Section 51-12-33, no party
315 shall offer evidence, or make an argument or other comment in the hearing of any juror
316 or prospective juror, concerning:
S. B. 68
- 13 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
317 (A) Any sentence of imprisonment or probation, fine, or other punishment that has
318 been, or could be, imposed in a criminal prosecution of any third person for the
319 wrongful conduct from which the claim of negligent security arises;
320 (B) The financial resources of any party or nonparty; or
321 (C) The effect of an apportionment of fault upon any award of damages to the plaintiff;
322 and
323 (3) If a jury fails as the trier of fact to apportion a reasonable degree of fault to the third
324 person whose wrongful conduct was a cause of the injury from which the claim of
325 negligent security arises, the trial court shall set aside the verdict of the jury and order a
326 retrial of liability and damages. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that an
327 apportionment of fault is unreasonable if the total percentage of fault apportioned to all
328 third persons for their wrongful conduct is less than the total percentage of fault
329 apportioned to all owners or occupiers, security contractors, and other persons and
330 entities that did not engage in wrongful conduct.
331 51-3-57.
332 (a) If a security contractor assumes and undertakes a duty to invitees and licensees to keep
333 all or part of a premises of an owner or occupier safe from the wrongful conduct of a third
334 person, the security contractor may be liable for negligent security only in the same
335 manner, to the same extent, and subject to the same limitations and provisions applicable
336 to an owner or occupier contained in this article. In no event shall a security contractor be
337 subject to liability for negligent security to an extent greater than the liability for negligent
338 security of an owner or occupier.
339 (b) No security contractor shall be liable for negligent security except as provided in this
340 Code section.
341 (c) Nothing in this Code section shall limit or otherwise affect any claim or remedy of an
342 owner or occupier for breach of contract."
S. B. 68
- 14 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
343 SECTION 7.
344 Said title is further amended in Article 1 of Chapter 12, relating to general provisions relative
345 to damages, by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
346 "51-12-1.1.
347 (a) In any civil action to recover damages resulting from injury or death to a person,
348 special damages for medical and healthcare expenses shall be recoverable only as provided
349 in this Code section.
350 (b) Special damages for medical and healthcare expenses shall be limited to the reasonable
351 value of medically necessary care, treatment, or services, and the amount of such special
352 damages shall be determined by the trier of fact.
353 (c) If the plaintiff in any such civil action has any form of public or private health
354 insurance, including benefits under a governmental workers' compensation program,
355 evidence relevant to the determination of the reasonable value of medically necessary care,
356 treatment, or services pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall include both the
357 amounts charged for past, present, or future medical and healthcare expenses and the
358 amounts actually necessary to satisfy such charges pursuant to the insurance contract or the
359 applicable governmental workers' compensation program, regardless of whether the health
360 insurance has been used, is used, or will be used to satisfy such charges.
361 (d) In any claim for medical and healthcare expenses rendered under a letter of protection
362 or any other arrangement by which a healthcare provider renders treatment in exchange for
363 a promise of payment for the plaintiff's medical and healthcare expenses from any
364 judgment or settlement of a civil action to recover damages resulting from injury or death
365 to a person, regardless of how such arrangement is referred to, the following shall be
366 relevant and discoverable:
367 (1) A copy of the letter of protection;
S. B. 68
- 15 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
368 (2) All charges for the plaintiff's medical and healthcare expenses, which shall be
369 itemized and, to the extent applicable, coded according to generally accepted medical
370 billing practices;
371 (3) If the healthcare provider sells the accounts receivable for the plaintiff's medical and
372 healthcare expenses to a third party at less than the invoice price:
373 (A) The name of the third party; and
374 (B) The dollar amount for which the third party purchased such accounts receivable;
375 and
376 (4) Whether the claimant was referred for treatment under a letter of protection or other
377 similar arrangement and, if so, the identity of the person who made the referral.
378 (e) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Code section abrogates the common
379 law collateral source rule to the extent necessary to introduce the evidence described in this
380 Code section; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall be construed or
381 applied to prevent the court from issuing appropriate jury instructions to clarify the role of
382 collateral source payments and to prevent potential jury confusion regarding the effect of
383 collateral source payments on the plaintiff's recovery.
384 (f) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed or applied to limit the right of a plaintiff
385 or defendant to present evidence or testimony, or both, challenging the reasonableness of
386 medical and healthcare expenses, whether incurred or projected future expenses, or the
387 medical necessity of any treatment."
388 SECTION 8.
389 Said title is further amended in said article by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
390 "51-12-15.
391 In any action to recover for damages for bodily injury or wrongful death, any party may
392 elect, by written demand prior to the entry of the pretrial order, to have fault and any award
393 of damages determined at trial in the following manner:
S. B. 68
- 16 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
394 (1) In the first phase of the trial, the trier of fact shall determine the fault of each
395 defendant, and if the trier of fact finds that any defendant is at fault for the plaintiff's
396 injuries or wrongful death, the trier of fact shall further determine through an appropriate
397 form of the verdict the percentages of fault of all persons or entities that contributed to
398 such injuries or wrongful death as provided in Code Section 51-12-33, prior to any
399 determination of the total amount of damages to be awarded, if any such findings are
400 required. The evidence and arguments of counsel in the first phase of the trial shall be
401 limited to the issues provided for in this paragraph;
402 (2) If the trier of fact finds in the first phase of the trial that any defendant is at fault for
403 the plaintiff's injuries or wrongful death, the trial shall be recommenced. In the second
404 phase of the trial, the trier of fact shall determine all compensatory damages to be
405 awarded to the plaintiff, if any, and the evidence and arguments of counsel shall be
406 limited to this issue; and
407 (3) If the trier of fact finds in the second phase of the trial that any compensatory
408 damages are to be awarded to the plaintiff, the trial may be recommenced for such further
409 proceedings as may be required, including, but not limited to, proceedings provided for
410 in subsection (d) of Code Section 51-12-5.1 concerning punitive damages and
411 proceedings to determine liability for, and the amount of, any attorney's fees, court costs,
412 or expenses of litigation that may be awarded by the trier of fact as provided by law."
413 SECTION 9.
414 (a) This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming
415 law without such approval.
416 (b) Sections 6 and 7 of this Act shall apply only with respect to causes of action arising on
417 or after the effective date of this Act, and any prior causes of action shall be governed by
418 prior law. It is the intention of the General Assembly that all other provisions of this Act
S. B. 68
- 17 -

25 SB 68/CSFA
419 shall apply to causes of action pending on the effective date of this Act, unless such
420 application would be unconstitutional.
421 SECTION 10.
422 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 68
- 18 -